Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND Section 1. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ ADMINISTRATION. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department for the blind for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,207,190 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 103.74 DIVISION II FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION Sec. 2. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof House File 2783, p. 2 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,073,808 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 71.87 2. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 721,779 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 10.80 3. PUBLIC BROADCASTING DIVISION For salaries, support, maintenance, capital expenditures, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,165,236 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 53.20 4. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION For reimbursement for career and technical education expenditures made by regional career and technical education planning partnerships in accordance with section 256.136: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,952,459 5. SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE a. For use as state matching moneys for federal programs that shall be disbursed according to federal regulations, including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,253,055 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 27.83 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $76,258 shall be allocated to the administrative costs associated with participation in the federal summer electronic benefit transfer program. 6. BIRTH TO AGE THREE SERVICES a. For expansion of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, Pub. L. No. House File 2783, p. 3 108-446, as amended to January 1, 2018, birth through age three services due to increased numbers of children qualifying for those services: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,721,400 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $383,769 shall be allocated to the child health specialty clinics administered by the state university of Iowa in order to provide additional support for infants and toddlers who are born prematurely, drug-exposed, or medically fragile. 7. EARLY HEAD START PROJECTS a. For early head start projects: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 574,500 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be used for implementation and expansion of early head start pilot projects addressing the comprehensive cognitive, social, emotional, and developmental needs of children from birth to age three, including prenatal support for qualified families. The projects shall promote healthy prenatal outcomes and healthy family functioning, and strengthen the development of infants and toddlers in low-income families. Priority shall be given to those organizations that have previously qualified for and received state funding to administer an early head start project. 8. STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT AND TEACHER QUALITY PROGRAM For purposes of the student achievement and teacher quality program established pursuant to chapter 284 , and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,990,467 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5.83 9. STATEWIDE STUDENT ASSESSMENT a. For distribution to the Iowa testing program by the department of education on behalf of school districts and accredited nonpublic schools to offset the costs associated with a statewide student assessment administered in accordance with section 256.7, subsection 21 , paragraph âbâ: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more than $300,000 shall be distributed to the Iowa testing programs within the state university of Iowa college of education House File 2783, p. 4 to offset the costs of administering the statewide student assessment at accredited nonpublic schools. 10. STATEWIDE CLEARINGHOUSE TO EXPAND WORK-BASED LEARNING For support costs associated with the creation of a statewide clearinghouse to expand work-based learning: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 11. POSTSECONDARY SUMMER CLASSES FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS PROGRAM For support costs associated with the creation of a program to provide additional moneys for resident high school pupils enrolled in grades 9 through 12 to attend a community college for college-level classes or attend a class taught by a community college-employed instructor during the summer and outside of the regular school year through a contractual agreement between a community college and a school district: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 12. JOBS FOR AMERICAâS GRADUATES For school districts to reinforce collaborative efforts and regional initiatives that accelerate work-based learning and credential attainment, and to provide direct career education services to identified middle school or high school students enrolled in school districts through direct instruction by a jobs for Americaâs graduates specialist: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,946,450 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 13. ATTENDANCE CENTER PERFORMANCE/GENERAL INTERNET SITE AND DATA SYSTEM SUPPORT For administration of a process for school districts to House File 2783, p. 5 establish specific performance goals and to evaluate the performance of each attendance center operated by the district in order to arrive at an overall school performance grade and report card for each attendance center, for internet site and data system support, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.60 14. SUCCESSFUL PROGRESSION FOR EARLY READERS For distribution to school districts for implementation of section 279.68, subsection 2 , relating to successful progression for early readers: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,824,782 15. EARLY WARNING SYSTEM FOR LITERACY a. For purposes of purchasing a statewide license for an early warning assessment and administering the early warning system for literacy established in accordance with section 279.68 and rules adopted in accordance with section 256.7, subsection 31 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,915,000 b. The department shall administer and distribute to school districts and accredited nonpublic schools the early warning assessment system that allows teachers to screen and monitor student literacy skills from prekindergarten through grade six. The department may charge school districts and accredited nonpublic schools a fee for the system not to exceed the actual costs to purchase a statewide license for the early warning assessment minus the moneys received by the department under this subsection. The fee shall be determined by dividing the actual remaining costs to purchase the statewide license for the school year by the number of pupils assessed under the system in the current fiscal year. School districts may use moneys received pursuant to section 257.10, subsection 11 , and moneys received for purposes of implementing section 279.68, subsection 2 , to pay the early warning assessment system fee. 16. IOWA READING RESEARCH CENTER a. For purposes of the Iowa reading research center in order to implement, in collaboration with the area education agencies, the provisions of section 256.9, subsection 49 , House File 2783, p. 6 paragraph âcâ: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 b. From moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more than $250,000 shall be used for collaborations with the state board of education relating to the approval of practitioner preparation programs pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ, and with the board of educational examiners for the establishment and continuing oversight of the advanced dyslexia specialist endorsement pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 21. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the center shall submit a report to the general assembly detailing the expenditures of moneys used for purposes of this paragraph âbâ. c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 17. COMPUTER SCIENCE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE FUND For deposit in the computer science professional development incentive fund established in section 284.6A : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 18. CHILDRENâS MENTAL HEALTH SCHOOL-BASED TRAINING AND SUPPORT a. For distribution to area education agencies for school-based childrenâs mental health services, including mental health awareness training for educators: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,899,682 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection for distribution to area education agencies, $200,000 shall be used for purposes of implementing a childrenâs grief and loss rural program to serve Iowa children in rural school districts or accredited nonpublic schools. The program shall be administered by, and the moneys allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be distributed to, an existing statewide not-for-profit health care organization that currently provides grief and loss services to children. For the fiscal year House File 2783, p. 7 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the health care organization receiving moneys pursuant to this paragraph shall prepare a report, in collaboration with the department of education, detailing the expenditures of moneys used for the purposes of this program and its outcomes, which shall be submitted to the general assembly by September 30, 2027. 19. BEST BUDDIES IOWA a. For school districts to create opportunities for one-to-one friendships, integrated employment, and leadership development for students with intellectual and developmental disabilities: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,000 b. The department of education shall establish criteria for the distribution of moneys appropriated under this subsection and shall require an organization receiving moneys under this subsection to annually report student identifying data for students participating in the program to the department in the manner prescribed by the department as a condition of receiving such moneys. 20. MIDWESTERN HIGHER EDUCATION COMPACT For distribution to the midwestern higher education compact to pay Iowaâs member state annual obligation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 118,450 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 21. NONPUBLIC SCHOOL CONCURRENT ENROLLMENT PAYMENTS TO COMMUNITY COLLEGES For payments to community colleges for the concurrent enrollment of accredited nonpublic school students under section 261E.8, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. House File 2783, p. 8 22. COMMUNITY COLLEGES For general state financial aid to merged areas, as defined in section 260C.2 , in accordance with section 260C.18C: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,858,161 23. IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,813,313 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 132.00 24. IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED PROGRAM For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,112,412 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 68.72 25. SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS (STEM) COLLABORATIVE INITIATIVE For purposes of the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) collaborative initiative established in section 256.111, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,310,409 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 7.00 a. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be expended for salaries, staffing, institutional support, activities directly related to recruitment of kindergarten through grade 12 mathematics and science teachers, and for ongoing mathematics and science programming for students enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12. b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not less than $500,000 shall be used to provide, or support access to, all of the following: (1) Technology and emerging technology education opportunities, including but not limited to artificial intelligence, computer science, data science, and related fields, to high school students and career academy students. House File 2783, p. 9 (2) Opportunities for students and instructional staff to obtain industry-recognized credentials, certifications, or other validated competencies. (3) Research-based or evidence-informed instructional content and learning frameworks. (4) Online or hybrid access to instructional content. (5) Instructional software, platforms, tools, or resources for classroom and student use. (6) Validation, certification, or credentialing of skills and competencies across a broad range of technology-related and artificial intelligence-related disciplines. (7) Professional development, training, or capacity-building opportunities for teachers and instructional staff. (8) Deployment, implementation, and programmatic support, including but not limited to alignment or integration with applicable academic standards or workforce needs. c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 26. THERAPEUTIC CLASSROOM INCENTIVE FUND For deposit in the therapeutic classroom incentive fund established in section 256.25 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,351,382 27. ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM For purposes of administering an online state job posting system that allows the department of education, school districts, charter schools, area education agencies, and accredited nonpublic schools to post job openings on an internet site: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 265,000 28. LEAD-K PROGRAM For purposes of maintaining and implementing the program established pursuant to section 256.106, including ensuring statewide consistency in guidance and supports related to language and communication outcomes for children who are deaf or hard of hearing: House File 2783, p. 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 29. DIVISION OF SPECIAL EDUCATION For general supervision, oversight, compliance, employee salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes within the area education agency regions and the department of education main office, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 60.00 30. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT For purposes of providing required professional development to public and nonpublic schools: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,676,458 31. COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION a. Administration For general administration salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for the administration of the future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship program in accordance with section 256.228, including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes related to the future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship program, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591,533 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.95 b. National guard service scholarship program For purposes of providing national guard service scholarships under the program established in section 256.210: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,600,000 c. All Iowa opportunity scholarship program (1) For deposit in the all Iowa opportunity scholarship fund created in section 256.212: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,229,468 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, if the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph exceed $500,000, âeligible institutionâ as defined in section 256.212 shall, during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, include accredited private institutions as defined in section 256.183. d. Teach Iowa scholar program House File 2783, p. 11 (1) For deposit in the teach Iowa scholar fund established in section 256.218: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,045,248 (2) From the moneys appropriated in this paragraph, $96,533 shall be allocated to grants to eligible applicants under the teach Iowa scholar program who teach in a school district that is located in a city in Iowa with a population of less than twenty-six thousand that is located more than twenty miles from a city with a population of greater than fifty thousand. e. Health care professional incentive program For deposit in the health care professional incentive program fund created in section 256.222: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,985,911 f. Rural veterinarian loan repayment program For deposit in the rural veterinary care trust fund created in section 256.226: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 g. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship program For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship fund created in section 256.228: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,927,005 h. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant fund created in section 256.229: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 i. Iowa workforce grant and incentive program For deposit in the Iowa workforce grant and incentive program fund created in section 256.230: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,500,000 j. Court reporter equipment grant program For deposit in the court reporter equipment grant program fund created in section 256.231: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50,000 32. ADVANCED DYSLEXIA SPECIALIST ENDORSEMENT For purposes of a grant program that provides grants to teachers licensed by the board of educational examiners to offset the costs associated with obtaining an advanced dyslexia specialist endorsement issued by the board of educational House File 2783, p. 12 examiners pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 21: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 335,000 33. SCHOOL DISTRICT ELECTRONIC MAIL SECURITY a. For purposes of procuring, implementing, and maintaining on-premises and secure electronic mail gateway appliances that support centralized policy management, automated threat response, and unified threat visibility, and that utilize artificial intelligence-powered security subscriptions and support services to protect school district electronic mail systems from phishing, compromise, malware, and other advanced cyber threats: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2030. Sec. 3. IOWA SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled worker and job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. For purposes of providing skilled workforce shortage tuition grants in accordance with section 256.227: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 2. For deposit in the workforce training and economic development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,100,000 From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more than $100,000 shall be used by the department for administration of the workforce training and economic development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A . 3. a. For capital projects at community colleges that meet the definition of the term âvertical infrastructureâ in section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 b. Moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be House File 2783, p. 13 disbursed pursuant to section 260G.6, subsection 3 . Projects that qualify for moneys appropriated in this subsection must include at least one of the following: (1) Accelerated career education program capital projects. (2) Major renovations and major repair needs, including health, life, and fire safety needs, including compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act. c. (1) If the career training physical expansion program fund created in section 84J.3 is enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2466, or successor legislation, or by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2168, or successor legislation, then the department of education shall deposit $3,500,000 of the moneys appropriated under paragraph âaâ into the career training physical expansion program fund. (2) The deposit of moneys described in this paragraph is contingent on the career training physical expansion program fund created in section 84J.3, if enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2466, or successor legislation, or by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2168, or successor legislation, receiving no other moneys for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, in any Act of the general assembly. 4. For deposit in the pathways for academic career and employment fund created in section 260H.2 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,800,000 5. For deposit in the gap tuition assistance fund established in section 260I.2 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 6. For support costs associated with administering a workforce preparation outcome reporting system for the purpose of collecting and reporting data relating to the educational and employment outcomes of workforce preparation programs receiving moneys pursuant to this section: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 75,000 7. For STEM best: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the House File 2783, p. 14 succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 4. CHIROPRACTIC LOAN FUNDS. Notwithstanding section 256.204, the moneys deposited in the chiropractic loan revolving fund created in section 256.204 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, may be used for purposes of the chiropractic loan forgiveness program established in section 256.205. Sec. 5. PRESCRIPTION DRUG COSTS. The department of administrative services shall pay the Iowa school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually impaired program the moneys collected from the counties during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, for expenses relating to prescription drug costs for students attending the Iowa school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually impaired program. DIVISION III FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS ââ STATE BOARD OF REGENTS Sec. 6. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the state board of regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. OFFICE OF STATE BOARD OF REGENTS a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 764,642 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.48 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the state board of regents shall submit a quarterly financial report to the general assembly in a format agreed upon by the state board of regents office and the legislative services agency. The report submitted for the quarter ending December 31, 2026, must include the five-year graduation rates for the regents universities. b. For distribution to the western Iowa regents resource center: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 268,297 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending House File 2783, p. 15 June 30, 2027, the state board of regents and the institutions of higher learning governed by the state board of regents shall not reduce moneys budgeted for the fiscal year for the institutionsâ police departments. d. For allocation in equal parts by the state board of regents to the state university of Iowa, the Iowa state university of science and technology, and the university of northern Iowa to support the John Pappajohn centers for entrepreneurship: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be used to supplement, not supplant, any other funding received by the John Pappajohn centers for entrepreneurship. 2. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA a. General university For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,496,355 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5,058.32 b. Oakdale campus For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,103,819 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 38.25 c. State hygienic laboratory For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,822,610 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 102.51 d. Family practice program For allocation by the dean of the college of medicine, with approval of the advisory board, to qualified participants to carry out the provisions of chapter 148D for the family practice residency education program, including salaries and support, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: House File 2783, p. 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,220,598 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.71 e. Child health care services For specialized child health care services, including childhood cancer diagnostic and treatment network programs, rural comprehensive care for hemophilia patients, and the Iowa high-risk infant follow-up program, including salaries and support, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 634,502 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.16 f. Statewide cancer registry For the statewide cancer registry, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 143,410 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.10 g. Substance abuse consortium For distribution to the Iowa consortium for substance abuse research and evaluation, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 53,427 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .99 h. Center for biocatalysis For the center for biocatalysis, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 696,342 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.28 i. Primary health care initiative For the primary health care initiative in the college of medicine, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 624,374 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.22 From the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, $254,889 shall be allocated to the department of family practice at the state university of Iowa college of medicine for family practice faculty and support staff. j. Birth defects registry For the birth defects registry, and for not more than the House File 2783, p. 17 following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 36,839 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .38 k. Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center For the Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 156,389 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.75 l. Iowa online advanced placement academy science, technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative For the Iowa online advanced placement academy science, technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative established in section 263.8A : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 463,616 m. Iowa flood center For the Iowa flood center for use by the universityâs college of engineering pursuant to section 466C.1 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,205,593 n. College of nursing For employing additional instructors in the college of nursing to increase the number of students who graduate from the college of nursing: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 o. Center for intellectual freedom For purposes of supporting the center for intellectual freedom established in section 263C.2: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 3. IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,864,938 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4,062.34 4. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA a. General university For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: House File 2783, p. 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,894,146 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,250.28 b. Real estate education program For purposes of the real estate education program, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 123,523 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .86 c. Educators for Iowa For purposes of recruiting additional students to participate in educational opportunities that lead to teacher licensure: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 d. Center for civic education For purposes of establishing and operating a center for civic education that promotes the values of free speech, civic leadership, public service, and citizenship, and that enhances civic education among students enrolled in colleges and universities in this state, students enrolled in prekindergarten through grade twelve in schools in this state, teachers, and the public by developing and implementing effective civic learning strategies, encouraging respectful dialogue, and offering educational resources related to free speech and civic knowledge: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 Sec. 7. ENERGY COST-SAVINGS PROJECTS ââ FINANCING. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the state board of regents may use notes, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness issued under section 262.48 to finance projects that will result in energy cost savings in an amount that will cause the state board to recover the cost of the projects within an average of six years. DIVISION IV STANDING APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 8. AT-RISK CHILDREN. Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in section 279.51 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of education for programs for at-risk children under section 279.51 shall not be more than $10,524,389. The amount of any House File 2783, p. 19 reduction in this section shall be prorated among the programs specified in section 279.51, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, and âcâ. Sec. 9. WORK-STUDY APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding section 256.209, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated from the general fund of the state to the college student aid commission of the department of education for the work-study program under section 256.209 shall be zero. DIVISION V STATE PROGRAM ALLOCATION Sec. 10. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraph a, subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and ending June 30, 2026 2027 , to the department, the amount of five hundred eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the issuance of national board certification awards in accordance with section 256.44 . Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, not less than eighty-five thousand dollars shall be used to administer the ambassador to education position in accordance with section 256.45 . Sec. 11. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraphs b, c, e, f, and g, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and ending June 30, 2026 2027 , up to seven hundred twenty-eight thousand two hundred sixteen dollars to the department for purposes of implementing the professional development program requirements of section 284.6 , assistance in developing model evidence for teacher quality committees established pursuant to section 284.4, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , and the evaluator training program in section 284.10 . A portion of the funds allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph may be used by the department for administrative purposes and for not more than four full-time equivalent positions. c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and ending June 30, 2026 2027 , an amount up to one million seventy-seven thousand eight hundred ten dollars to the department for the establishment of teacher development academies in accordance with section 284.6, subsection 10 . A House File 2783, p. 20 portion of the funds allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph may be used for administrative purposes. e. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and ending June 30, 2026 2027 , to the department an amount up to fifty thousand dollars for purposes of the fine arts beginning teacher mentoring program established under section 256.34 . f. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and ending June 30, 2026 2027 , to the department an amount up to six hundred twenty-six thousand one hundred ninety-one dollars shall be used by the department for a delivery system, in collaboration with area education agencies, to assist in implementing the career paths and leadership roles considered pursuant to sections 284.15 , 284.16 , and 284.17 , including but not limited to planning grants to school districts and area education agencies, technical assistance for the department, technical assistance for districts and area education agencies, training and staff development, and the contracting of external expertise and services. In using moneys allocated for purposes of this paragraph, the department shall give priority to school districts with certified enrollments of fewer than six hundred students. A portion of the moneys allocated annually to the department for purposes of this paragraph may be used by the department for administrative purposes and for not more than five full-time equivalent positions. g. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026 2027 , and for each subsequent fiscal year, to the department, ten million dollars for purposes of implementing the supplemental assistance for high-need schools provisions of section 284.11 . Annually, of the moneys allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph, up to one hundred thousand dollars may be used by the department for administrative purposes and for not more than one full-time equivalent position. DIVISION VI IOWA TUITION GRANTS Sec. 12. Section 256.183, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. âEligible institutionâ means an institution of higher learning located in Iowa which is operated privately and not controlled or administered by any state agency or any House File 2783, p. 21 subdivision of the state, which is not exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and which meets all of the criteria in subsection 1 , paragraphs âdâ through âkâ , and is a school of barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences licensed under chapter 157 and is accredited by a national accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of education. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017, such a school of barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences shall provide a matching aggregate amount of institutional financial aid equal to at least seventy-five percent of the amount received by the institutionâs students for Iowa tuition grant assistance under section 256.191 . For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the school of barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences shall provide a matching aggregate amount of institutional financial aid equal to at least eighty-five percent of the amount received in that fiscal year. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, and each succeeding fiscal year, the matching aggregate amount of institutional financial aid shall be at least equal to the match provided by eligible institutions under section 261.9, subsection 3 , paragraph âaâ , Code 2023. Sec. 13. Section 256.192, subsections 1, 2, 4, and 5, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1. A vocational-technical tuition grant may be awarded to any resident of Iowa who establishes financial need and who is admitted and in attendance as a full-time or part-time student in a any of the following: a. A vocational-technical or career option program at a community college in the state , and who establishes financial need . b. An eligible institution. 2. All classes, including liberal arts classes, identified by the community college or eligible institution as required for completion of the studentâs vocational-technical or career option program , or barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences program, shall be considered a part of the studentâs vocational-technical or career option program or barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences program for the purpose of determining the studentâs eligibility for a House File 2783, p. 22 grant. Notwithstanding subsection 3 , if a student is making satisfactory academic progress but the student cannot complete a vocational-technical or career option program or barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences program in the time frame allowed for a student to receive a vocational-technical tuition grant as provided in subsection 3 because additional classes are required to complete the program, the student may continue to receive a vocational-technical tuition grant for not more than one additional enrollment period. 4. a. (1) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition grant to a qualified full-time student who is enrolled in a vocational-technical or career option program at a community college shall not exceed the lesser of one thousand two hundred dollars per year or the amount of the studentâs established financial need. b. (2) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition grant to a qualified part-time student who is enrolled in a vocational-technical or career option program at a community college in a course of study including at least three semester hours but fewer than twelve semester hours or the trimester or quarter equivalent shall be equal to the amount of a vocational-technical tuition grant that would be paid to a full-time student, except that the commission shall prorate the amount in a manner consistent with the federal Pell grant program proration. b. (1) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition grant to a qualified full-time student who is enrolled in an eligible institution for the fall and spring semesters, or the equivalent, shall be the amount of the studentâs financial need for that period not to exceed six thousand dollars. (2) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition grant to a qualified full-time student who is enrolled in an eligible institution for the summer semester or equivalent shall be one-half the amount of the vocational-technical tuition grant the student receives under subparagraph (1). (3) The amount of a vocational-technical tuition grant to a qualified part-time student who is enrolled in an eligible institution in a course of study including at least three semester hours but fewer than twelve semester hours for the House File 2783, p. 23 fall, spring, and summer semesters, or the equivalent, shall be equal to the amount of a tuition grant that would be paid to a full-time student times a number which represents the number of hours in which the part-time student is actually enrolled divided by twelve semester hours, or the equivalent. (4) If a qualified student receives financial aid under any other program, the full amount of such financial aid shall be considered part of the studentâs financial resources available in determining the amount of the studentâs financial need for that period. In no case may the stateâs total financial contribution to the studentâs education, including financial aid under any other state or federal program, exceed the tuition and mandatory fees at the eligible institution the student attends. 5. A vocational-technical tuition grant shall be awarded on an annual basis, requiring reapplication by the student for each year. Payments under the grant shall be allocated equally among the semesters or quarters of the year upon certification by the institution community college or eligible institution that the student is in full-time or part-time attendance in a vocational-technical or career option program or a barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences program , as defined under rules of the department. If the student discontinues attendance before the end of any term after receiving payment of the grant, the entire amount of any refund due that student, up to the amount of any payments made under the annual grant, shall be paid by the institution community college or eligible institution to the state. Sec. 14. Section 256.194, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 15. Section 256.194, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the commission for deposit in the vocational-technical tuition grants fund established in section 256.192, subsection 8 , the sum of one million seven hundred fifty thousand one hundred eighty-five one million eight hundred sixty-three thousand ninety-nine dollars. House File 2783, p. 24 Sec. 16. REPEAL. Section 256.191, Code 2026, is repealed. Sec. 17. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. Any moneys appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of the Iowa tuition grants for-profit institutions fund established in section 256.191, subsection 8, that remain unencumbered or unobligated as of July 1, 2026, shall be transferred to the vocational-technical tuition grants fund established in section 256.192, subsection 8. DIVISION VII IOWA SPECIAL EDUCATION COUNCIL ââ REPEAL Sec. 18. REPEAL. Section 256.35B, Code 2026, is repealed. DIVISION VIII DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ REPORTING REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO ANTIBULLYING PROGRAMMING Sec. 19. Section 279.51A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5. a. Each school district shall report to the department of education, in a manner prescribed by the department, an annual count of all incidents of violence that result in injury or property damage or assault by a student in a school building, on school grounds, or at a school-sponsored function, and any time a student is referred for the use of or transfer to a therapeutic classroom. The report shall include but not be limited to demographic information on students reported as victims and reported as perpetrators of incidents of violence that result in injury or property damage or assault, including but not limited to disaggregated information on race, gender, national origin, age, grade level, and disability, along with any other data required for the department to implement the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95, with appropriate safeguards to ensure student privacy. The department shall compile the reports. b. The department shall compile and summarize the reports, categorized by behavior, and shall submit the summary an annual report to the general assembly by on or before November 1 annually each year that contains all of the following: (1) A summary of the annual reports compiled pursuant to paragraph âaâ . House File 2783, p. 25 (2) A description of the departmentâs antibullying programming and current and projected expenditures for the antibullying programming for the immediately preceding fiscal year. c. A teacher or administrator who submits a report in accordance with this section and who meets the requirements of section 280.27 or section 613.21 shall be immune from civil or criminal liability relating to such action, as well as for participating in any administrative or judicial proceeding resulting from or relating to the report pursuant to the provisions of sections 280.27 and 613.21 . The provisions of section 70A.29 shall apply to a teacher or administrator who submits a report in accordance with this section or who reports an incident of violence or assault to a local law enforcement agency in good faith and without fraudulent intent or the intent to deceive. Personal information regarding a student in a report submitted pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential as required under the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1232g, and in the same manner as personal information in student records maintained, created, collected, or assembled by or for a school corporation or educational institution in accordance with section 22.7, subsection 1 . DIVISION IX BOARD OF EDUCATIONAL EXAMINERS ââ FEES Sec. 20. Section 256.155, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2. Licensing fees are payable to the treasurer of state and shall be deposited with the executive director of the board. The executive director shall deposit twenty-five percent of the fees collected annually with the treasurer of state and the fees shall be credited to the general fund of the state. The remaining licensing fees Licensing fees collected during the fiscal year shall be retained by and are appropriated to the board for the purposes related to the boardâs duties. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , licensing fees retained by and appropriated to the board pursuant to this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for House File 2783, p. 26 the activities of the board as provided in this part until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 3. The executive director shall keep an accurate and detailed account of fees received, including fees paid to the treasurer of state and fees retained by the board. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2783, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor